North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 32. Conference of District Attorneys.

§ 7A-411.
Establishment and purpose.

There is created the Conference of District Attorneys of North Carolina, of which every district attorney in North Carolina is a member. The purpose of the Conference is to assist in improving the administration of justice in North Carolina by coordinating the prosecution efforts of the various district attorneys, by assisting them in the administration of their offices, and by exercising the powers and performing the duties provided for in this Article.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 152.

§ 7A-412.
Annual meetings; organization; election of officers.

Annual Meetings. — The Conference shall meet annually at a time and place selected by the President of the Conference.

Election of Officers. — Officers of the Conference are a President, a President-elect, a Vice-president, and other officers from among its membership that the Conference may designate in its bylaws. Officers are elected for one-year terms at the annual Conference, and take office on July 1 immediately following their election.

Executive Committee. — The Executive Committee of the Conference consists of the President, the President-elect, the Vice-president, and four other members of the Conference. One of these four members shall be the immediate past president if there is one and if he continues to be a member.

Organization and Functioning; Bylaws. — The bylaws may provide for the organization and functioning of the Conference, including the powers and duties of its officers and committees. The bylaws shall state the number of members required to constitute a quorum at any meeting of the Conference or the Executive Committee. The bylaws shall set out the procedure for amending the bylaws.

Calling Meetings; Duty to Attend. — The President or the Executive Committee may call a meeting of the Conference upon 10 days’ notice to the members, except upon written waiver of notice signed by at least three-fourths of the members. A member should attend each meeting of the Conference and the Executive Committee of which he is given notice. Members are entitled to reimbursement for travel and subsistence expenses at the rate applicable to State employees.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 152.

§ 7A-413.
Powers of Conference.

The Conference may:

Cooperate with citizens and other public and private agencies to promote the effective administration of criminal justice.

Assist prosecutors in the effective prosecution and trial of criminal offenses, and develop an advisory trial manual.

Develop advisory manuals to assist prosecutors in the organization and administration of their offices, case management, calendaring, case tracking, filing, and office procedures.

Cooperate with the Administrative Office of the Courts and the School of Government at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill concerning education and training programs for prosecutors and staff.

The Conference may not adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 152; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 2006-264, s. 29(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-264, s. 29(b), effective August 27, 2006, substituted “School of Government at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill” for “Institute of Government” in subdivision (a)(4).

§ 7A-414.
Executive Secretary; clerical support.

The Conference may employ an executive secretary and any necessary supporting staff to assist it in carrying out its duties.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 152.